District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

15-716

Advances to Court of General Sessions Clerk for witness fees.

Repealed.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 554, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(16)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-716.